Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE A. COURTS

CHAPTER 30. MUNICIPAL COURTS OF RECORD

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL LAW FOR MUNICIPAL COURTS OF RECORD

Sec. 30.00001. SHORT TITLE; APPLICATION. (a) This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Municipal Courts of Record Act.

(b) This subchapter applies to:

(1) each municipality listed in this chapter; and

(2) each other municipality in which the governing body of the municipality has created a municipal court of record as authorized by Section 30.00003.

(c) If a provision of this subchapter conflicts with a specific provision for a particular municipality, the specific provision controls.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.481 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1127, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 30.00002. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Appellate court" means:

(A) the county criminal court, the county criminal court of appeals, or the municipal court of appeals; or

(B) the county court at law if there is no county criminal court, county criminal court of appeals, or municipal court of appeals.

(2) "Governing body" means the legislative body of a municipality, without regard to the name or title given to any particular body.

(3) "Municipality" means an incorporated city, town, or village.

(4) "Presiding judge" means the presiding municipal judge, chief judge, or administrative judge.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.482 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00003. CREATION OF MUNICIPAL COURTS OF RECORD. (a) The governing body may by ordinance create a municipal court of record if the governing body determines that the creation of the court is necessary to provide a more efficient disposition of the cases arising in the municipality.

(b) The ordinance may establish as many municipal courts of record as needed as determined by the governing body.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), the ordinance shall give each court a numerical designation, beginning with "Municipal Court of Record No. 1."

(d) If a municipality has a unified court of record, that court shall be the "Municipal Court of Record in the City of (name of municipality)" and the municipality may establish by ordinance divisions, beginning with "Division No. 1."

(e) A municipal court of record may not exist concurrently with a municipal court that is not a municipal court of record in the municipality.

(f) A municipal court of record has no terms and may sit for any time for the transaction of business of the court.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.483 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00004. ABOLITION OF COURT. If the governing body of the city finds that a municipal court of record is unnecessary, the governing body shall by ordinance declare the office of the municipal judge vacant at the end of the term for which the judge was last selected. Any cases then pending shall be transferred to a court with proper jurisdiction of the offense.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.484 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00005. JURISDICTION. (a) A municipal court of record has the jurisdiction provided by general law for municipal courts.

(b) The court has jurisdiction over criminal cases arising under ordinances authorized by Sections 215.072, 217.042, 341.903, and 551.002, Local Government Code.

(c) The governing body may by ordinance provide that the court has concurrent jurisdiction with a justice court in any precinct in which the municipality is located in criminal cases that arise within the territorial limits of the municipality and are punishable only by fine.

(d) The governing body of a municipality by ordinance may provide that the court has:

(1) civil jurisdiction for the purpose of enforcing municipal ordinances enacted under Subchapter A, Chapter 214, Local Government Code, or Subchapter E, Chapter 683, Transportation Code;

(2) concurrent jurisdiction with a district court or a county court at law under Subchapter B, Chapter 54, Local Government Code, within the municipality's territorial limits and property owned by the municipality located in the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction for the purpose of enforcing health and safety and nuisance abatement ordinances; and

(3) authority to issue:

(A) search warrants for the purpose of investigating a health and safety or nuisance abatement ordinance violation; and

(B) seizure warrants for the purpose of securing, removing, or demolishing the offending property and removing the debris from the premises.

(e) The court has concurrent jurisdiction with a district court and a justice court over expunction proceedings relating to the arrest of a person for an offense punishable by fine only.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.485 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1093, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.77(1), eff. April 1, 2009.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1149 (H.B. 557), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 30.00006. JUDGE. (a) A municipal court of record is presided over by one or more municipal judges.

(b) The governing body shall by ordinance appoint its municipal judges.

(c) A municipal judge must:

(1) be a resident of this state;

(2) be a citizen of the United States;

(3) be a licensed attorney in good standing; and

(4) have two or more years of experience in the practice of law in this state.

(d) The governing body shall provide by ordinance for the term of office of its municipal judges. The term must be for a definite term of two or four years.

(e) The municipal judge shall take judicial notice of state law and the ordinances and corporate limits of the municipality. The judge may grant writs of mandamus, attachment, and other writs necessary to the enforcement of the jurisdiction of the court and may issue writs of habeas corpus in cases in which the offense charged is within the jurisdiction of the court. A municipal judge is a magistrate and may issue administrative search warrants.

(f) The municipal judges within a municipality may exchange benches and act for each other in any proceeding pending in the courts. An act performed by any of the judges is binding on all parties to the proceeding.

(g) A person may not serve as a municipal judge if the person is employed by the same municipality. A municipal judge who accepts employment with the municipality vacates the judicial office.

(h) The governing body shall determine the salary of a municipal judge. The amount of a judge's salary may not be diminished during the judge's term of office. The salary may not be based directly or indirectly on fines, fees, or costs collected by the court.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.486 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00007. PRESIDING JUDGE. (a) If there is more than one municipal judge in the municipality, the governing body of the municipality shall appoint one of the judges as the presiding judge.

(b) The presiding judge shall:

(1) maintain a central docket for cases filed within the territorial limits of the municipality over which the municipal courts of record have jurisdiction;

(2) provide for the distribution of cases from the central docket to the individual municipal judges to equalize the distribution of business in the courts;

(3) request the jurors needed for cases that are set for trial by jury;

(4) temporarily assign judges or substitute judges to exchange benches and to act for each other in a proceeding pending in a court if necessary for the expeditious disposition of business in the courts;

(5) supervise and control the operation and clerical functions of the administrative department of each court, including the court's personnel, during the proceedings of the court; and

(6) establish a court security committee to adopt security policies and procedures for the courts served by the presiding judge that is composed of:

(A) the presiding judge, or the presiding judge's designee, who serves as presiding officer of the committee;

(B) a representative of the law enforcement agency or other entity that provides the primary security for the court;

(C) a representative of the municipality; and

(D) any other person the committee determines necessary to assist the committee.

(c) A court security committee may recommend to the governing body the uses of resources and expenditures of money for courthouse security, but may not direct the assignment of those resources or the expenditure of those funds.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.486 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Redesignated from Sec. 30.00006(d), (e) by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 190 (S.B. 42), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 30.00008. VACANCIES: TEMPORARY REPLACEMENT. (a) If a vacancy occurs in the office of municipal judge of a court of record, the governing body shall by ordinance or charter provide for the appointment of a qualified person to fill the office for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(b) The governing body may appoint one or more qualified persons to be available to serve for a municipal judge who is temporarily absent due to illness, family death, continuing legal or judicial education programs, or any other reason. The presiding judge, or the municipal judge if there is no presiding judge, shall select one of the qualified persons appointed by the governing body to serve during the absence of a municipal judge. The substitute judge, while serving as a municipal judge, has all the powers and shall discharge all the duties of a municipal judge. A substitute judge must meet the qualifications prescribed for the municipal judge.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 34, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.487 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00007 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.000085. REMOVAL OF JUDGE. A municipal judge of a general law municipality may be removed from office at any time for the reasons stated and by the procedure provided for the removal of members of a municipal governing body in Subchapter B, Chapter 21, Local Government Code. A municipal judge of a home-rule municipality may be removed from office by the governing body for the reasons stated and by the procedures provided for the removal of judges in the charter of the municipality or, if the charter does not provide for the removal of judges, as provided by Section 1-a, Article V, Texas Constitution, or by the procedure provided for the removal of members of a municipal governing body in Subchapter B, Chapter 21, Local Government Code.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 402, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 30.00009. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The governing body shall by ordinance provide for the appointment of a clerk of the municipal courts of record. The municipal clerk shall keep the records of the municipal courts of record, issue process, and generally perform the duties that a clerk of a county court at law exercising criminal jurisdiction performs for that court. In addition, the clerk shall maintain an index of all court judgments in the same manner as county clerks are required by law to prepare for criminal cases arising in county courts.

(b) The governing body may provide deputy clerks, warrant officers, and other personnel as needed for the proper operation of the courts.

(c) The clerk and other court personnel perform their duties under the direction and control of the presiding judge.

(d) The governing body shall by ordinance provide for the hiring, direction, supervision, and removal of the personnel authorized in the annual budget for the clerk's office.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.488 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00008 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00010. COURT REPORTER. (a) The municipality shall provide a court reporter to preserve a record in cases tried before a municipal court of record. The court reporter must meet the qualifications provided by law for official court reporters. The reporter shall be compensated by the municipality in the manner determined by the governing body.

(b) The court reporter may use written notes, transcribing equipment, video or audio recording equipment, or a combination of those methods to record the proceedings of the court. The reporter shall keep the record for the 20-day period beginning the day after the last day of the proceeding, trial, or denial of motion for new trial, or until any appeal is final, whichever occurs last.

(c) The court reporter is not required to record testimony in a case unless the judge or one of the parties requests a record.

(d) Instead of providing a court reporter, the governing body may provide that the proceedings may be recorded by a good quality electronic recording device. If the governing body authorizes the electronic recording, the court reporter is not required to be present to certify the reporter's record. The recording shall be kept for the 20-day period beginning the day after the last day of the court proceeding, trial, or denial of motion for new trial, whichever occurs last. If a case is appealed, the proceedings shall be transcribed from the recording by an official court reporter.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.489 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00009 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 37 (S.B. 1014), Sec. 1, eff. May 9, 2005.

Text of section effective until January 01, 2025

Sec. 30.00011. PROSECUTIONS. All prosecutions in municipal courts of record shall be conducted as provided by Article 45.03, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.490 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00010 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.056, eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on January 01, 2025

Sec. 30.00011. PROSECUTIONS. All prosecutions in municipal courts of record shall be conducted as provided by Article 45A.005, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.490 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00010 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.056, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 30.00012. COURT FACILITIES. The governing body shall provide courtrooms, jury rooms, offices, office furniture, libraries, law books, and other facilities and supplies that the governing body determines are necessary for the proper operation of the municipal courts of record.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.000123. LOCATION OF COURT PROCEEDINGS AND TERMS AND SESSIONS OF COURT FOLLOWING CERTAIN DISASTERS. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, if a disaster, as defined by Section 418.004, precludes a municipal court of record from conducting its proceedings at the location assigned for the proceedings, the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region, with the approval of the judge of the affected municipal court of record, may designate for the proceedings an alternate location:

(1) in the corporate limits of the municipality; or

(2) outside the corporate limits of the municipality at the location the presiding judge determines is closest in proximity to the municipality that allows the court to safely and practicably conduct its proceedings, provided the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region for the designated location approves if that presiding judge is not the presiding judge making the designation.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, if a disaster, as defined by Section 418.004, precludes a municipal court of record from holding its terms, the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region, with the approval of the judge of the affected municipal court of record, may designate the terms and sessions of court.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (S.B. 40), Sec. 14, eff. June 7, 2019.

Sec. 30.000125. SEAL. (a) The governing body shall provide each municipal court of record with a seal.

(b) The seal's appearance and use must substantially conform to Article 45.02, Code of Criminal Procedure, but must include the phrase "Municipal Court of/in __________, Texas."

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.000126. COMPLAINT; PLEADING. Complaints and pleadings must substantially conform to the relevant provisions of Chapters 27 and 45, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00013. JURY.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(a) Ordinances, rules, and procedures concerning a trial by a jury, including the summoning of jurors, must substantially conform to Chapter 45, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(a) Ordinances, rules, and procedures concerning a trial by a jury, including the summoning of jurors, must substantially conform to Chapter 45A, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(b) The presiding judge, the municipal court clerk, or the court administrator, as determined by ordinance, shall supervise the selection of persons for jury service.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.492 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00012 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.057, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 30.00014. APPEAL. (a) A defendant has the right of appeal from a judgment or conviction in a municipal court of record. The state has the right to appeal as provided by Article 44.01, Code of Criminal Procedure. The county criminal courts or county criminal courts of appeal in the county in which the municipality is located or the municipal courts of appeal have jurisdiction of appeals from a municipal court of record. If there is no county criminal court, county criminal court of appeal, or municipal court of appeal, the county courts at law have jurisdiction of an appeal. If a county does not have a county court at law under Chapter 25, the county court has jurisdiction of any appeal.

(b) The appellate court shall determine each appeal from a municipal court of record conviction and each appeal from the state on the basis of the errors that are set forth in the appellant's motion for new trial and that are presented in the clerk's record and reporter's record prepared from the proceedings leading to the conviction or appeal. An appeal from the municipal court of record may not be by trial de novo.

(c) To perfect an appeal, the appellant must file a written motion for new trial with the municipal clerk not later than the 10th day after the date on which judgment is rendered. The motion must set forth the points of error of which the appellant complains. The motion or an amended motion may be amended by leave of court at any time before action on the motion is taken, but not later than the 20th day after the date on which the original or amended motion is filed. The court may for good cause extend the time for filing or amending, but the extension may not exceed 90 days from the original filing deadline. If the court does not act on the motion before the expiration of the 30 days allowed for determination of the motion, the original or amended motion is overruled by operation of law.

(d) To perfect an appeal, the appellant must also give notice of the appeal. If the appellant requests a hearing on the motion for new trial, the appellant may give the notice of appeal orally in open court on the overruling of the motion. If there is no hearing, the appellant must give a written notice of appeal and must file the notice with the court not later than the 10th day after the date on which the motion is overruled. The court may for good cause extend that time period, but the extension may not exceed 90 days from the original filing deadline.

(e) If the defendant is in custody, the appeal is perfected when the notice of appeal is given as provided by Article 44.13, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 346), Sec. 4.40(5), eff. January 1, 2020.

(g) The defendant shall pay the fee for an actual transcription of the proceedings.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.493 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00013 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 37 (S.B. 1014), Sec. 2, eff. May 9, 2005.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 380 (H.B. 4147), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 346), Sec. 4.15, eff. January 1, 2020.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 346), Sec. 4.40(5), eff. January 1, 2020.

Sec. 30.00015. APPEAL BOND. (a) If the defendant is not in custody, the defendant may not take an appeal until the defendant files an appeal bond with the municipal court of record. The bond must be approved by the court and must be filed not later than the 10th day after the date on which the motion for new trial is overruled. If the defendant is in custody, the defendant shall be committed to jail unless the defendant posts the appeal bond.

(b) The appeal bond must be in the amount of $100 or double the amount of the fines and costs adjudged against the defendant, whichever is greater.

(c) The bond must:

(1) state that the defendant was convicted in the case and has appealed; and

(2) be conditioned on the defendant's immediate and daily personal appearance in the court to which the appeal is taken.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.494 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00014 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00016. RECORD ON APPEAL. The record on appeal must substantially conform to the provisions relating to the preparation of a record on appeal in the Texas Rules of Appellate Procedure and the Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.495 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00015 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00017. CLERK'S RECORD. The clerk's record must substantially conform to the provisions relating to the preparation of a clerk's record in the Texas Rules of Appellate Procedure and the Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.496 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00016 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 37 (S.B. 1014), Sec. 3, eff. May 9, 2005.

Sec. 30.00018. BILLS OF EXCEPTION. Bills of exception must substantially conform to the provisions relating to the preparation of bills of exception in the Texas Rules of Appellate Procedure and the Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.497 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00017 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00019. REPORTER'S RECORD. (a) A reporter's record included in the record on appeal must substantially conform to the provisions relating to the preparation of a reporter's record in the Texas Rules of Appellate Procedure and the Code of Criminal Procedure.

(b) The appellant shall pay for the reporter's record.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.498 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00018 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 37 (S.B. 1014), Sec. 4, eff. May 9, 2005.

Sec. 30.00020. TRANSFER OF RECORD. (a) Not later than the 60th day after the date on which the notice of appeal is given or filed, the parties must file with the municipal clerk:

(1) the reporter's record;

(2) a written description of material to be included in the clerk's record in addition to the required material; and

(3) any material to be included in the clerk's record that is not in the custody of the clerk.

(b) On completion of the record, the municipal judge shall approve the record in the manner provided for record completion, approval, and notification in the court of appeals.

(c) After the court approves the record, the clerk shall promptly send the record to the appellate court clerk for filing. The appellate court clerk shall notify the defendant and the prosecuting attorney that the record has been filed.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.499 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00019 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 37 (S.B. 1014), Sec. 5, eff. May 9, 2005.

Sec. 30.00021. BRIEF ON APPEAL. (a) An appellant's brief on appeal from a municipal court of record must present points of error in the manner required by law for a brief on appeal to the court of appeals.

(b) The appellant must file the brief with the appellate court clerk not later than the 15th day after the date on which the clerk's record and reporter's record are filed with that clerk. The appellant or the appellant's attorney must certify that the brief has been properly mailed to the appellee.

(c) The appellee must file the appellee's brief with the appellate court clerk not later than the 15th day after the date on which the appellant's brief is filed.

(d) Each party, on filing the party's brief with the appellate court clerk, shall deliver a copy of the brief to the opposing party and to the municipal judge.

(e) The record and the briefs on appeal shall be limited as far as possible to the questions relied on for reversal.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.500 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00020 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 37 (S.B. 1014), Sec. 6, eff. May 9, 2005.

Sec. 30.00022. NEW TRIAL. The trial court shall decide from the briefs of the parties whether the appellant should be permitted to withdraw the notice of appeal and be granted a new trial by the court. The court may grant a new trial at any time before the record is filed with the appellate court.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00023. COURT RULES. (a) Except as modified by this subchapter, the Code of Criminal Procedure and the Texas Rules of Appellate Procedure govern the trial of cases before the municipal courts of record. The courts may make and enforce all rules of practice and procedure necessary to expedite the trial of cases before the courts that are not inconsistent with law.

(b) The appellate courts may make and enforce all rules of practice and procedure that are not inconsistent with law and that are necessary to expedite the dispatch of appeals from the municipal courts of record.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.501 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00021 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00024. DISPOSITION ON APPEAL. (a) According to the law and the nature of the case, the appellate court may:

(1) affirm the judgment of the municipal court of record;

(2) reverse and remand for a new trial;

(3) reverse and dismiss the case; or

(4) reform and correct the judgment.

(b) Unless the matter was made an issue in the trial court or it affirmatively appears to the contrary from the clerk's record or reporter's record, the appellate court shall presume that:

(1) venue was proven in the trial court;

(2) the jury, if any, was properly impaneled and sworn;

(3) the defendant was arraigned and pleaded to the complaint; and

(4) the municipal judge certified the charge before it was read to the jury.

(c) In each case decided by the appellate court, the court shall deliver a written opinion or order either sustaining or overruling each assignment of error presented. The court shall set forth the reasons for its decision. The appellate court clerk shall mail copies of the decision to the parties and to the municipal judge as soon as the decision is rendered.

(d) The appellate court may determine the rules for oral argument. The parties may submit the case on the record and briefs without oral argument.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.502 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00022 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 37 (S.B. 1014), Sec. 7, eff. May 9, 2005.

Sec. 30.00025. CERTIFICATE OF APPELLATE PROCEEDINGS. (a) When the judgment of the appellate court becomes final, the clerk of that court shall certify the proceedings and the judgment and shall mail the certificate to the municipal clerk. The municipal clerk shall file the certificate with the papers in the case and note the certificate on the case docket.

(b) If the municipal court of record judgment is affirmed, to enforce the judgment the court may:

(1) forfeit the bond of the defendant;

(2) issue a writ of capias for the defendant;

(3) issue an execution against the defendant's property;

(4) order a refund for the defendant's costs; or

(5) conduct an indigency hearing at the court's discretion.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.503 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00023 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00026. EFFECT OF ORDER OF NEW TRIAL. If the appellate court awards a new trial to the appellant, the case stands as if a new trial had been granted by the municipal court of record.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.504 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00024 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00027. APPEALS TO COURT OF APPEALS. (a) The appellant has the right to appeal to the court of appeals if:

(1) the fine assessed against the defendant exceeds $100 and the judgment is affirmed by the appellate court; or

(2) the sole issue is the constitutionality of the statute or ordinance on which a conviction is based.

(b) The provisions of the Code of Criminal Procedure relating to direct appeals from a county or a district court to the court of appeals apply to the appeal, except that:

(1) the record and briefs on appeal in the appellate court constitute the record and briefs on appeal to the court of appeals unless the rules of the court of criminal appeals provide otherwise; and

(2) the record and briefs shall be filed directly with the court of appeals.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.505 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 30.00025 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1324 (S.B. 480), Sec. 4, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. LUBBOCK

Sec. 30.00041. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Lubbock.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county courts at law of Lubbock County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.001 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00044. JUDGE. (a) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(1), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(b) A municipal judge is elected by the qualified voters of the city for a term of four years.

(c) A municipal judge must be a licensed attorney in good standing, must have practiced law in this state for five years, and must be a citizen of the United States and of this state. The judge must satisfy the residency requirements pertaining to a member of the city council. A person may not serve as a municipal judge while the person holds other office or employment with the city government. A municipal judge who takes such an office or employment vacates the judicial office.

(d) to (i) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(1), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(j) A municipal judge shall comply with the financial statement requirements under Chapter 572.

(k) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(1), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(l) Sections 30.00007(b)(5) and 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(40), eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.004 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 3, 139(1), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 3.01(a), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 872 (H.B. 3014), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 30.00046. COURT REPORTER. (a) , (b) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(1), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(c) Section 30.00010(d) does not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.006 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 4, 139(1), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00049. COMPLAINT; PROSECUTION; PLEADING. (a) A proceeding in a municipal court of record commences with a complaint. The complaint must begin "In the name and by the authority of the State of Texas" and must conclude "Against the peace and dignity of the State." If the offense is only covered by an ordinance, it may also conclude "Contrary to the said ordinance."

(b) A complaint before the court may be sworn to before an officer authorized to administer oaths or before the municipal judge, clerk, city secretary, or city attorney, or the assistant or deputy of the judge, clerk, city secretary, or city attorney, each of whom may administer oaths for that purpose.

(c) A complaint must be in writing and must state:

(1) the name of the accused, if known;

(2) an accurate description of the accused, if the name is unknown;

(3) in plain and intelligible words, the offense with which the accused is charged;

(4) the place where the offense was committed, which must appear to be within the jurisdiction of the court; and

(5) the date on which the offense was committed, which must show that the offense is not barred by limitations.

(d) A prosecution in a court shall be conducted by the city attorney or an assistant or deputy city attorney.

(e) All pleadings must be in writing and must be filed with the clerk.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 30.009 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER C. IRVING

Sec. 30.00081. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Irving.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Dallas County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 477, Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.0241 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.05, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00084. JUDGE. (a) to (g) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(2), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(h) In addition to exercising powers under Section 30.00006, a municipal judge, with the approval of all parties, may order a defendant and the victim or complainant in a case before the municipal court to engage in mediation or alternative dispute resolution. The city shall provide mediation services and pay all costs of those services.

(i) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(2), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(j) Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 477, Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.0244 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.05, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 6, 139(2), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00085. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager of the city may appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record who may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the city charter, and city ordinances.

(b) Sections 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 477, Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.0245 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.05, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00086. COURT REPORTER. (a) The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

(b) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(2), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 477, Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.0246 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.05, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 8, 139(2), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER D. EL PASO

Sec. 30.00121. SHORT TITLE; APPLICATION. (a) This subchapter may be cited as the El Paso Courts Act.

(b) This subchapter applies to the City of El Paso.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.031 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00122. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "appellate court" means the El Paso Municipal Court of Appeals.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.032 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00123. MARRIAGE CEREMONIES. The judge of the appellate court and each municipal judge may conduct marriage ceremonies in the city.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.033 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00128. JUDGE. (a) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(3), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(b) A municipal judge is elected by the qualified voters of the city for a term of two years unless the city by charter amendment provides for a four-year term as provided by Article XI, Section 11, of the Texas Constitution.

(c), (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(3), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(e) The municipal judges shall select by a majority vote of those judges a presiding judge of the municipal courts of record.

(f) The presiding municipal judge may, when necessary for the expeditious disposition of the business of the courts and with the approval of the governing body of the city, divide a municipal court of record into one or more divisions. A division is presided over by an associate municipal judge. A division has concurrent jurisdiction with the other divisions and municipal courts of record. Divisions of the courts may be in concurrent and continuous session, either day or night, at the discretion of the presiding judge. The presiding judge may assign and transfer any case pending in any of the courts or divisions to any other of the courts or divisions. The presiding judge may direct the manner in which cases are filed and docketed. He may assign a case or proceeding pending in any of the courts to the judge of another court or division. He may assign the judge of any of the courts or divisions to try a case or hear a proceeding pending in another court or division.

(g) In addition to complying with Section 30.00006(h), the salary of the presiding judge must be set at an amount that is at least 20 percent more than the salary of the regular municipal judges.

(h) to (k) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(3), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(l) Section 30.00007(b) does not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.038 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 9, 139(3), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00129. COURT CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. In addition to satisfying the requirements of Section 30.00009, the governing body of the city shall provide a clerk of the municipal courts of record, deputy clerks, and other municipal court personnel, including at least one bailiff for each court, as necessary for the proper operation of the municipal courts.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.039 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00130. COURT REPORTER; USE OF CLERK'S RECORDS. (a) To preserve a record in cases tried before the municipal courts of record, the city shall provide a court reporter. The governing body of the city shall determine the qualifications and compensation of the court reporter.

(b) The court reporter may preserve the record of proceedings by written notes, transcribing equipment, recording equipment, or any combination of those methods. The court reporter is not required to take or record testimony in a case in which neither the defendant, the prosecutor, nor the judge demands it.

(c) Testimony, exhibits, and evidence given by a witness in a proceeding in a municipal court of record are solely for the purposes of that proceeding or an appeal from that proceeding, and in any civil proceeding, evidence relating to the testimony, exhibits, evidence, or reproductions of testimony, exhibits, or evidence is privileged and not admissible except for impeachment purposes.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1263, Sec. 1.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.040 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1263, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 37 (S.B. 1014), Sec. 8, eff. May 9, 2005.

Sec. 30.00136. CONTINUATION OF MUNICIPAL COURT OF APPEALS. (a) The El Paso Municipal Court of Appeals continues in existence as long as a municipal court of record exists in the city.

(b) If the municipal court of record ordinance is repealed, the appellate court continues in existence as long as there are appeals before it. A reversal and remand for new trial or other order returning a case to the trial court shall be to the municipal court that replaces the municipal courts of record.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.046 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00137. APPELLATE COURT JURISDICTION. (a) The appellate court has exclusive jurisdiction over all appeals from the municipal courts of record of the city. The county courts at law of El Paso County have no jurisdiction over appeals from municipal courts.

(b) The appellate court and the judge of that court have the power in criminal law matters to issue to the municipal courts and judges of those courts the writs of mandamus, procedendo, prohibition, injunction, and other writs necessary to protect the appellate court's jurisdiction or enforce its judgments.

(c) The appellate court has the power on affidavit or otherwise to ascertain matters of fact necessary to the exercise of its jurisdiction.

(d) The judge of the appellate court is a magistrate within the meaning of the Code of Criminal Procedure, 1965.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.047 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00138. TERM OF COURT. The appellate court may sit for the transaction of business at any time during the year, and each term begins and ends with the calendar year. The appellate court may use the city council chambers or other appropriate location as its courtroom for argument of cases and other court matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.048 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00139. APPELLATE COURT CLERK. In addition to other duties, the city clerk serves as the appellate court clerk.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.049 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00140. APPELLATE COURT JUDGE. (a) The appellate judge shall be elected by the qualified voters of the city for a term of two years, unless the city by charter amendment provides for a four-year term as provided by Article XI, Section 11, of the Texas Constitution. The appellate judge must be a citizen of the United States and of this state and must have been a practicing attorney of this state for at least five years immediately preceding his election or appointment.

(b) A vacancy in the appellate court shall be filled by appointment by the governing body of the city. The appointee serves until the next regular municipal election, and at that election the vacancy for the unexpired or full term shall be filled by election by the qualified voters of the city.

(c) The appellate judge shall take the oath of office required for a municipal judge.

(d) An appointed or elected appellate judge may not be removed from office except in the same manner and for the same causes as provided by law for county judges and as provided by Article V, Section 1-a, of the Texas Constitution.

(e) The appellate judge is entitled to compensation from the city as set by the governing body of the city. The judge's compensation may not be diminished but may be increased during his term of office.

(f) The city shall provide the appellate court with necessary clerical help. The appellate judge and the city may agree that the judge will provide for his own clerical help, and in that event the judge is entitled to additional reasonable compensation by agreement with the city.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.050 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00141. APPELLATE COURT SEAL. The seal of the appellate court is the same as that provided by law for municipal courts of record, except that the seal must contain the words "Municipal Court of Appeals of the City of El Paso," and the seal shall be judicially noticed.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.051 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00142. SPECIAL APPELLATE JUDGE. (a) If the appellate judge is unable to act, the governing body of the city may appoint a person, or the appellant and the city attorney in a particular case may agree on a person, to serve as the special appellate judge. The special appellate judge has the powers and duties of the office and is entitled to receive the same compensation as the regular appellate judge for serving as a special appellate judge.

(b) A municipal judge or associate municipal judge may not be appointed or selected as a special appellate judge.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), an appointment of a special appellate judge automatically terminates when the regular appellate judge returns to duty.

(d) If an appellate judge is disqualified from hearing a particular case, the governing body of the city may appoint a person, or the appellant and the city attorney may agree on a person, to serve as the special appellate judge. A special appellate judge appointed or selected under this subsection is entitled to receive the same daily compensation as the regular appellate judge for each day he works on the case he was appointed or selected to hear. An appointment automatically terminates at the time the mandate or mandates issue in the case he was appointed to hear.

(e) A special appellate judge must have the qualifications required of the regular appellate judge and shall, before he begins serving as a special appellate judge, take the oath of office required for a municipal judge.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.052 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00143. RULES. The appellate judge may make and publish rules of appellate criminal procedure not inconsistent with this subchapter or other law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.053 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00144. NEW TRIAL. (a) A motion for new trial is not necessary to authorize an appeal.

(b) If a motion for new trial is made, it must be filed not later than the 10th day after the date of the rendition of the judgment of conviction.

(c) One or more amended motions for new trial may be filed without leave of court before any preceding motion for new trial filed by the movant is overruled if the motion is filed not later than 15 days after the date of the rendition of the judgment of conviction.

(d) If an original or amended motion for new trial is not determined by written order signed not later than 30 days after the date of the rendition of the judgment of conviction, the motion is overruled by operation of law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.054 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00145. RIGHT OF APPEAL. (a) A defendant has the right of appeal from a judgment of conviction in the municipal court of record under the rules prescribed by this subchapter. The state has the right of appeal as provided by Article 44.01, Code of Criminal Procedure. The El Paso Municipal Court of Appeals has jurisdiction over appeals from the municipal courts of record, and all appeals from convictions in the municipal court of record must be prosecuted in the appellate court, the court of appeals, or the court of criminal appeals by the city attorney or an assistant city attorney.

(b) Section 30.00014 does not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.055 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00146. NO DE NOVO APPEALS. An appeal from the municipal court of record may not be taken to a trial de novo in the appellate court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.056 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00147. PERFECTING APPEAL. (a) A defendant, as a condition of perfecting an appeal to the appellate court, must file an appeal bond, unless the defendant is in custody. An appeal may be perfected by timely filing with the municipal court clerk an appeal bond that meets the requirements of Subchapter A. It is not necessary to file a notice of appeal. If the defendant is in custody, the appeal is perfected when notice of appeal is given as provided by Article 44.13, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 346), Sec. 4.40(6), eff. January 1, 2020.

(c) The appeal bond must be filed not later than the 10th day after overruling of the motion or amended motion for new trial, or if there is no motion or amended motion for new trial, not later than the 10th day after the rendition of the judgment of conviction.

(d) For good cause shown, not later than the 100th day after the date of rendition of the judgment of conviction, the appellate court or the court of appeals may permit the filing of an appeal bond or the giving of notice of appeal in the municipal court of record even though the time limits set under this section have expired.

(e) Except for the limitation contained in Subsection (d), the appellate court may, for good cause shown, extend any time limits set in this subchapter for the appellate process.

(f) In a case in which an appellant or the prosecutor files a motion in the appellate court, the opposite party shall be given an opportunity to answer the motion under time limits and conditions set by the appellate court rules.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 346), Sec. 4.40(6), eff. January 1, 2020.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.057 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 346), Sec. 4.40(6), eff. January 1, 2020.

Sec. 30.00162. DISPOSITION ON APPEAL; PRESUMPTIONS; DECISION. (a) The appellate court may:

(1) affirm the judgment of the municipal court of record;

(2) reverse and remand for a new trial;

(3) reverse and dismiss the case;

(4) reform and correct the judgment;

(5) abate the appeal or dismiss the appeal; or

(6) enter any other appropriate order, as the law and the nature of the case require.

(b) Unless the following matters were made an issue in the trial court or it affirmatively appears to the contrary from the clerk's record or reporter's record, the appellate court shall presume that:

(1) venue was proven in the court below;

(2) the jury was properly impaneled and sworn;

(3) the defendant was arraigned;

(4) the defendant pleaded to the complaint; and

(5) the court's charge was certified by the municipal court judge before it was read to the jury.

(c) In each case decided by the appellate court, the court shall deliver a written opinion or order either sustaining or overruling each assignment of error presented and a judgment shall be entered on the opinion or order. If an assignment of error is overruled, no reason need be given by the appellate court, but cases relied on by the court may be cited. If an assignment of error is sustained, the appellate court shall set forth the reasons for the decision and precedent if it exists. The appellate court clerk shall mail copies of the decision and judgment of the appellate court to the parties and to the municipal court clerk as soon as the decision is rendered by the appellate court.

(d) After the decision of the appellate court is delivered, a party desiring a rehearing must present, not later than the 10th day after the date the decision is delivered, to the court a motion for rehearing. The motion must distinctly specify the grounds relied on for rehearing and must be accompanied by written argument in behalf of the motion. Oral argument in support of the motion is not permitted. A reply to a motion for rehearing need not be filed unless requested by the court. If a motion for rehearing is granted, the court may make final disposition of the case without reargument, may order the case resubmitted, with or without oral argument, or may issue other orders appropriate under the circumstances of the particular case. A second motion for rehearing may not be filed by the losing party unless permitted by appellate court rules.

(e) Immediately after a decision of the appellate court becomes final, the clerk of that court shall issue a mandate and a bill of costs in the case to the trial court unless directed to withhold the mandate by the appellate court.

(f) If a decision of the appellate court is appealed to a court of appeals, the appellate court on receipt of the mandate or other order from the court of appeals shall immediately comply with the order or mandate by issuing its own order or mandate and bill of costs, as the case may be. When a decision of a court of appeals becomes final, the clerk of that court shall issue a mandate in the case to the appellate court. A decision of a court of appeals is final as provided by Article 42.045, Code of Criminal Procedure, 1965.

(g) Original papers transmitted as the record on appeal to the court of appeals, on final disposition of the case in the court of appeals or the court of criminal appeals, shall be returned to the court clerk from which they were received. The clerk of each court shall preserve copies of briefs and papers originally filed in that court.

(h) The municipal court clerk and the appellate court clerk shall keep a copy of each decision of the appellate court in a volume or volumes with an index so that the public can inspect the decisions of the appellate court without the necessity of inspecting individual records of each case.

(i) When the mandate of the appellate court is received by the municipal court clerk, the clerk shall file it with the papers in the case and note it on the docket. If the judgment has been affirmed or the appeal is dismissed, a proceeding is not necessary after filing the appellate court mandate in the municipal court of record to enforce the judgment of the court, except to forfeit the bond of the defendant, to issue a capias for the defendant, or to issue an execution against the defendant's property.

(j) If the appellate court awards a new trial to the defendant, the cause stands as if a new trial had been granted by the municipal court of record, and the defendant shall continue on his appeal bond and shall appear for trial on notification mailed to his address on the appeal bond.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.02(3), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.072 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 37 (S.B. 1014), Sec. 9, eff. May 9, 2005.

Sec. 30.00164. ALTERNATE APPELLATE PROCEDURE. (a) If the El Paso Municipal Court of Appeals created by this subchapter is held unconstitutional or invalid, all appeals under this subchapter shall be considered as taken to the county courts at law of El Paso County. Those appeals shall be docketed as provided by county court at law rules. The county courts at law of El Paso County have jurisdiction over those appeals and this subchapter applies to those appeals. One county court at law of El Paso County shall act as the appellate court. That court shall be designated from time to time as the appellate court by the majority vote of the judges of the county courts at law of El Paso County. All appeals pending in the appellate court on the date that any decision becomes final holding the municipal court of appeals unconstitutional or invalid shall be transferred by the appellate court to the county courts at law of El Paso County, and all decisions of the appellate court that have become final on or before that date are valid.

(b) If appeals are taken to the county courts at law of El Paso County under Subsection (a), a reference to "appellate court" in this subchapter means the county court at law of El Paso County that is designated as the appellate court under this section, except that a provision of this subchapter that is inconsistent with the laws, statutes, and rules applicable to creation and organization of the county courts at law of El Paso County will not apply, and an appeal is not tried de novo in the county court at law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.074 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER E. KENNEDALE

Sec. 30.00181. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Kennedale.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Tarrant County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 180, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.0761 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00184. JUDGE. (a) to (j) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(4), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(k) Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 180, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.0764 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 16, 139(4), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.001845. MAGISTRATES.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(a) The governing body may appoint one or more magistrates in addition to magistrates provided under Article 2.09, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(a) The governing body may appoint one or more magistrates in addition to magistrates provided under Article 2A.151, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(b) A magistrate does not have to possess all the qualifications necessary to be a municipal court of record judge.

(c) A magistrate may not preside over the court or hear contested cases.

(d) A magistrate may:

(1) conduct an arraignment;

(2) hold an indigency hearing;

(3) accept a plea;

(4) sign a judgment;

(5) set the amount of a bond; and

(6) perform other functions under Article 15.17, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 569 (H.B. 1394), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.058, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 30.00185. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager or city administrator of the city shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record who may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the city charter, and city ordinances.

(b) Sections 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 180, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.0765 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00186. COURT REPORTER. (a) The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

(b) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(4), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 180, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.0766 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 18, 139(4), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER F. SAN ANTONIO

Sec. 30.00221. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of San Antonio.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county courts at law of Bexar County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.081 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.08, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00224. JUDGE. (a) , (b) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(5), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(c) In addition to satisfying the requirements of Section 30.00006(c), a municipal judge must have been a resident of the city for at least three years immediately preceding the judge's appointment.

(d) to (j) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(5), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(k) Section 30.00007(b)(5) does not apply to this subchapter.

(l) In addition to the duties imposed under Sections 30.00007(b)(1)-(4), the presiding judge shall promulgate work rules for the administration of the municipal courts.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.37(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 28, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.084 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.08, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 20, 139(5), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00225. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) , (b) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(5), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(c) Sections 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.38(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.085 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.08, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00226. COURT REPORTER. (a) The city shall provide a court reporter for the purpose of preserving a record in cases tried before the municipal court of record. The person selected as court reporter must meet the qualifications provided by law for official court reporters. The chief administrative officer of the city shall set the compensation of the court reporter on the recommendation of the presiding municipal judge.

(b) The court reporter may preserve the record through written notes, transcribing equipment, recording equipment, or any combination of those methods. The reporter is not required to record testimony in a case in which neither the defendant, the prosecutor, nor the judge demands it.

(c) Instead of using a court reporter to preserve a record in a case, the governing body may authorize the use of a good quality electronic recording device to report court proceedings. If the governing body authorizes an electronic recording, the court reporter is not required to be present to certify the reporter's record. The recording shall be kept for the 20-day period beginning the day after the last day of the court proceeding, trial, or denial of motion for new trial, whichever occurs last. If a case is appealed, the proceedings shall be transcribed from the recording by an official court reporter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.086 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.08, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 888 (H.B. 4714), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 30.00229. COMPLAINT; PROSECUTION; PLEADING. (a) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(5), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(e) All pleadings in a municipal court of record must be in writing and must be filed with the clerk.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.089 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.08, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(5), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER G. MANSFIELD

Sec. 30.00261. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Mansfield.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Tarrant County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 182, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.1041 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.09, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00264. JUDGE. (a) to (j) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(6), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(k) Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 182, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.1044 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.09, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 23, 139(6), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00265. MAGISTRATES. (a) The governing body may appoint one or more magistrates.

(b) A magistrate does not have to possess all the qualifications necessary to be a municipal court of record judge.

(c) A magistrate may not preside over the court or hear contested cases.

(d) A magistrate may:

(1) conduct an arraignment;

(2) hold an indigency hearing;

(3) accept a plea;

(4) sign a judgment;

(5) set the amount of a bond; and

(6) perform other functions under Article 15.17, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 182, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.1045 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.09, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00266. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager of the city shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record who may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the city charter, and city ordinances.

(b) Sections 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 182, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.1046 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.09, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00267. COURT REPORTER. (a) The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

(b) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(6), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 182, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.1047 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.09, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 25, 139(6), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER H. WICHITA FALLS

Sec. 30.00301. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Wichita Falls.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county courts at law of Wichita County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.111 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.10, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00304. JUDGE. (a) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(7), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(b) In addition to satisfying the requirements of Section 30.00006(c), a municipal judge must maintain residence in the city during the tenure of office but need not be a resident of the city at the time of the appointment. The judge may not engage in the private practice of law while in office. The judge must execute a bond and take the oath of office required of a county judge.

(c) to (h) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(7), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(i) Sections 30.00007(a) and (b)(5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.114 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.10, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 27, 139(7), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00305. CLERK. (a) The city manager shall appoint a clerk of the municipal courts of record. The clerk holds office at the pleasure of the city manager and is subject to all city charter provisions, ordinances, and personnel policies relating to non-civil service city employees.

(b) Section 30.00009(c) does not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 83, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.115 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.10, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 28, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00306. COURT REPORTER. (a) The city manager shall appoint an official court reporter under Section 30.00010 for the purpose of preserving a record in cases tried before the municipal courts of record. The reporter holds office at the pleasure of the city manager. The city manager may appoint more than one reporter for each court if necessary to dispose of the business of the court without delay. If a reporter is not demanded, a reporter's record may be prepared from mechanical, audio, or video recordings of the proceedings.

(b) Section 30.00010(d) does not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 83, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.116 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.10, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 29, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 37 (S.B. 1014), Sec. 10, eff. May 9, 2005.

Sec. 30.00308. CIVIL SERVICE ORDINANCE; VACATION OF COURT. (a) The judges, clerk and deputy clerks, and court reporters of the municipal courts are not classified employees under the city civil service ordinance. The governing body of the city may provide by ordinance that all other employees of the courts may be hired and paid as classified employees under the city civil service ordinance. The judges, clerk and deputy clerks, and court reporters are entitled to receive the same vacation, sick leave, and other benefits that are provided for other nonclassified employees under regulations provided by the governing body by ordinance and may be authorized or required by the governing body to participate in the city retirement program.

(b) If after the establishment of a municipal court of record the governing body finds by ordinance that the condition of the dockets of the other courts of the county does not require the existence of the court to dispose properly of the cases arising in the city, the governing body shall declare the offices of the municipal judge, clerk, court reporter, and other employees of the court to be vacated at the end of the term for which the judge was last appointed. Any case then pending shall be transferred to a court with proper jurisdiction of the offense.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.118 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.10, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00310. FILING OF ORIGINAL PAPERS.

Text of section as amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1020, Sec. 3

The clerk of the municipal courts of record shall file the original papers and proceedings in each case under the direction of the presiding judge. Instead of filing the original papers, papers may be preserved by microfilm or other process that correctly and legibly reproduces or that forms a medium for copying or reproducing. The filed or preserved papers constitute the records of the courts and a separate record book is not required. Preserved records are admissible in evidence in civil cases as provided by the Texas Rules of Evidence relating to the admissibility of contents of writing, recordings, and photographs. Records, however maintained, shall be destroyed by the court clerk after five years after final disposition of the case. Records, however maintained, relating to parking offenses shall be destroyed by the court clerk after two years after final disposition of the case.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1020, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.120 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.10, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00310. FILING OF ORIGINAL PAPERS.

Text of section as amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 29

(a) The clerk of the municipal courts of record shall file the original complaint and the original of other papers and proceedings in each case under the direction of the presiding judge. The filed original papers constitute the records of the courts and a separate record book is not required.

(b) The clerk shall keep a separate folder for each case, and shall note on the outside of the folder:

(1) the style of the case;

(2) the nature of the charged offense;

(3) the dates that the warrant was issued and returned;

(4) the date the examination or trial was held;

(5) whether trial was held by jury or before a judge;

(6) trial settings;

(7) any verdict of the jury;

(8) any judgment of the court;

(9) any motion for a new trial and the decision on the motion;

(10) whether an appeal was taken; and

(11) the date and the manner in which the judgment and sentence were enforced.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 29, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.120 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.10, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER I. BURLESON

Sec. 30.00341. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Burleson.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county courts at law of Johnson County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 181, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.1341 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.11, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 30, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00344. JUDGE. (a) to (j) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(8), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(k) Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 181, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.1344 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.11, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 31, 139(8), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00345. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager of the city shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record who may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the city charter, and city ordinances.

(b) Sections 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 181, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.1345 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.11, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 32, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00346. COURT REPORTER. (a) The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

(b) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(8), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 181, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.1346 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.11, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 33, 139(8), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER J. FORT WORTH

Sec. 30.00381. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Fort Worth.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Tarrant County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.141 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.12, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 34, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00384. JUDGE. (a) , (b) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(9), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(c) The judge must maintain residence in the city during the tenure of office.

(d) to (j) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(9), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(k) Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.40(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 599, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 290, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.144 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.12, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 35, 139(9), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00385. CLERK. (a) The city manager with the consent of the governing body of the city shall appoint a clerk of the municipal courts of record. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the city charter, and city ordinances.

(b) Section 30.00009(c) does not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.145 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.12, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 36, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00388. CIVIL SERVICE ORDINANCE; VACATION OF COURT. (a) The judges, clerk and deputy clerks, and court reporters of the municipal courts of record are not classified employees under civil service, charter, or ordinance provisions. The governing body of the city may provide by ordinance that all other employees of the courts may be hired and paid as classified employees under civil service, charter, or ordinance provisions. Judges, clerks, deputy clerks, and court reporters are entitled to receive the same vacation, sick leave, and other benefits that are provided for other nonclassified employees under regulations provided by the governing body by ordinance and may be authorized or required by the governing body to participate in the city retirement program.

(b) If after the establishment of a municipal court of record the governing body finds by ordinance that the condition of the dockets of the other courts of the county does not require the existence of the court to properly dispose of the cases arising in the city, the governing body shall declare the offices of the municipal judge, clerk, court reporter, and other employees of the court to be vacated at the end of the term for which the judge was last appointed. Any case then pending shall be transferred to a court with proper jurisdiction of the offense.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.148 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.12, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER K. GRAND PRAIRIE

Sec. 30.00421. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Grand Prairie.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Dallas County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.1641 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.13, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 37, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00426. JUDGE. (a) to (j) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(10), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(k) Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.1646 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.13, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 38, 139(10), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00427. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager shall appoint a clerk of a municipal court of record who may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the city charter, and city ordinances.

(b) Sections 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.1647 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.13, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 39, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00428. COURT REPORTER. (a) The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010. The reporter shall be compensated by the city in the manner determined by the city manager.

(b) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(10), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.1648 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.13, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 40, 139(10), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER L. SWEETWATER

Sec. 30.00461. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Sweetwater.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the County Court of Nolan County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.171 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.14, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 41, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00464. JUDGE. (a) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(11), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(b) A municipal judge must be a licensed attorney in good standing in this state. The judge must be a citizen of the United States and of this state. The judge must maintain residence in the city during the tenure of office but need not be a resident of the city at the time of the appointment.

(c) to (e) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(11), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(f) Section 30.00007(b)(5) does not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.174 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.14, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 42, 139(11), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00465. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(11), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(b) The governing body of the city shall provide deputy clerks, warrant officers, and other personnel, including at least one bailiff for each court, as needed for the proper operation of the courts.

(c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(11), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.175 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.14, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(11), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00466. COURT REPORTER. (a) The municipal judge shall appoint a court reporter under Section 30.00010, whose qualifications shall be determined by the judge or, if there is more than one municipal judge, by the presiding municipal judge.

(b) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(11), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(c) Section 30.00010(d) does not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.176 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.14, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 43 and 139(11), eff. Sept. 1, 1999

SUBCHAPTER M. CROWLEY

Sec. 30.00491. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Crowley.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Tarrant County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 193, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.1881 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.15, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 44, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00494. JUDGE. (a) to (j) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(12), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(k) Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 193, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.1884 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.15, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 45, 139(12), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.004945. MAGISTRATES.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(a) The governing body may appoint one or more magistrates in addition to magistrates provided under Article 2.09, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(a) The governing body may appoint one or more magistrates in addition to magistrates provided under Article 2A.151, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(b) A magistrate does not have to possess all the qualifications necessary to be a municipal court of record judge.

(c) A magistrate may not preside over the court or hear contested cases.

(d) A magistrate may:

(1) conduct an arraignment;

(2) hold an indigency hearing;

(3) accept a plea;

(4) sign a judgment;

(5) set the amount of a bond; or

(6) perform other functions under Article 15.17, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 46, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.059, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 30.00495. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager or city administrator of the city shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record who may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the city charter, and city ordinances.

(b) Sections 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 193, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.1885 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.15, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 47, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00496. COURT REPORTER. (a) The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

(b) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(12), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 193, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.1886 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.15, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 48, 139(12), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER N. LONGVIEW

Sec. 30.00531. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Longview.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the County Court of Gregg County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.201 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.16, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00534. JUDGE. (a) to (e) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(13), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(f) Section 30.00007(b)(5) does not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.204 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.16, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 50, 139(13), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00536. COURT REPORTER. The municipal judge shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.206 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.16, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 51, 139(13), eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1260, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER O. PANTEGO

Sec. 30.00561. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the town of Pantego.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Tarrant County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 274, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.2191 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.17, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 52, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00564. JUDGE. (a) to (j) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(14), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(k) Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 274, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.2194 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.17, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 53, 139(14), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00565. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager of the town shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record who may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the town's annual budget for the clerk's office. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the town charter, and town ordinances.

(b) Sections 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 274, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.2195 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.17, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 54, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00566. COURT REPORTER. (a) The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

(b) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(14), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 274, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.2196 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.17, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 55, 139(14), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER P. MIDLAND

Sec. 30.00601. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Midland.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the County Court of Midland County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.231 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.18, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 56, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00604. JUDGE. (a) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(15), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(b) In addition to satisfying the requirements of Section 30.00006(c), a municipal judge must maintain residence in the city during the tenure of office but need not be a resident of the city at the time of the appointment. The judge shall serve full time and may not engage in the private practice of law while in office.

(c) to (e) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(15), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(f) Section 30.00007(b)(5) does not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.234 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.18, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 5, 139(15), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00605. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(15), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(b) The governing body of the city shall provide deputy clerks, warrant officers, and other personnel, including at least one bailiff for each court, as needed for the proper operation of the municipal courts of record.

(c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(15), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.235 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.18, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(15), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00606. COURT REPORTER. (a) The municipal judge shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010, who must meet qualifications determined by the judge or, if there is more than one judge, by the presiding municipal judge. The governing body of the city shall set the compensation of the court reporter on the recommendation of the presiding judge.

(b) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(15), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(c) Section 30.00010(d) does not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.236 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.18, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 58, 139(15), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER Q. RIVER OAKS

Sec. 30.00631. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of River Oaks.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Tarrant County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 653, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.2481 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.19, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 59, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00634. JUDGE. (a) to (c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(16), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(d) In addition to exercising powers under Section 30.00006(e), a municipal judge shall devote as much time to the office as it requires.

(e) to (j) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(16), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(k) Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 653, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.2484 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.19, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 60, 139(16), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00635. MAGISTRATES.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(a) The governing body may appoint one or more magistrates in addition to magistrates provided under Article 2.09, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(a) The governing body may appoint one or more magistrates in addition to magistrates provided under Article 2A.151, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(b) A magistrate does not have to possess all the qualifications necessary to be a municipal court of record judge.

(c) A magistrate may not preside over the court or hear contested cases.

(d) A magistrate may:

(1) conduct an arraignment;

(2) hold an indigency hearing;

(3) accept a plea;

(4) sign a judgment;

(5) set the amount of a bond; and

(6) perform other functions under Article 15.17, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 653, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.2485 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.19, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.060, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 30.00636. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city administrator of the city shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record who may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the city charter, and city ordinances.

(b) Sections 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 653, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.2486 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.19, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 61, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00637. COURT REPORTER. (a) The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

(b) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(16), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 653, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.2487 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.19, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 62, 139(16), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00653. JOINT COURTS: CREATION. (a) The governing body of the city may contract with one or more municipalities that have municipal courts of record to establish a joint municipal court of record to serve the contracting municipalities.

(b) A joint municipal court of record created under this section replaces each municipality's individual municipal court of record.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 653, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.2503 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.19, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00654. JOINT COURT: JUDGES. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a joint municipal court of record created under Section 30.2503 is presided over by a municipal judge or alternate municipal judge who is appointed by the governing bodies of the contracting municipalities for a two-year term.

(b) The judge of a joint municipal court of record may be removed from office by the governing bodies of the contracting municipalities at any time for incompetency, misconduct, malfeasance, or inability to perform the tasks of the office.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 653, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.2504 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.19, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00655. JOINT COURTS: JURISDICTION. (a) The jurisdiction of a joint municipal court of record created under Section 30.2503 is the combined jurisdiction of the municipal courts of the contracting municipalities.

(b) An appeal from a joint municipal court of record created under Section 30.2503 is to the county criminal court of the county in which the offense occurred. If that county does not have a county criminal court, appeal is to the county court of law of the county.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 653, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.2505 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.19, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00656. JOINT COURT: PROSECUTING ATTORNEY. A municipality that contracts under Section 30.2503 may provide its own prosecuting attorney or the contracting municipalities may agree on the selection of one or more prosecuting attorneys.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 653, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.2506 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.19, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00657. JOINT COURT: APPLICABLE LAW. (a) The municipalities by contract shall select one of the contracting municipality's enabling statutes as the source of applicable procedural requirements for the operation of the joint municipal court of record established under Section 30.2503.

(b) All of the provisions of the statute selected under Subsection (a) apply to the operation of the joint municipal court of record. If there is a conflict with any of the provisions in Sections 30.2503-30.2506, those sections control.

(c) Any matter that is not governed by the contracting municipalities' enabling legislation or other law shall be resolved by the contract entered into under Section 30.2503.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 653, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.2507 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.19, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER R. HOUSTON

Sec. 30.00671. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Houston.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Harris County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.261 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.20, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 63, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00674. JUDGE. (a) to (f) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(17), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(g) A municipal judge may only be removed under Article V, Section 1-a, of the Texas Constitution.

(h) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(17), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(i) Sections 30.00007(b)(5) and 30.000085 do not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 30, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.264 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.20, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 64, 139(17), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00675. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) , (b) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(17), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(c) Section 30.00009(c) does not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.265 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.20, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 65, 139(17), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00676. COURT REPORTER. (a) Each municipal judge may appoint an official court reporter under Section 30.00010 to transcribe the trial proceedings, including testimony, voir dire examinations, objections, and final arguments.

(b) Section 30.00010(d) does not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.266 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.20, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 66, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER S. MARSHALL

Sec. 30.00701. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Marshall.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the County Court of Harrison County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.291 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.21, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 67, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00704. JUDGE. (a) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(18), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(b) In addition to exercising powers under Section 30.00006(e), a municipal judge shall devote as much time to the office as it requires.

(c) to (e) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(18), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(f) Section 30.00007(b)(5) does not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.294 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.21, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 68, 139(18), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00706. COURT REPORTER. (a) The municipal judge shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

(b) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(18), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(c) Section 30.00010(d) does not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.296 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.21, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 69, 139(18), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER T. AUSTIN

Sec. 30.00731. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Austin.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county courts at law of Travis County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.321 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.22, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 70, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00734. JUDGE. (a) to (f) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(19), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(g) In addition to satisfying the requirements of Section 30.00006(c), a municipal judge must have been a resident of the city for the two-year period immediately preceding appointment.

(h) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(19), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(i) Section 30.00007(b)(5) does not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.324 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.22, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 71, 139(19), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00736. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The governing body of the city shall appoint a clerk of the municipal courts of record, who shall be known as the municipal clerk. The municipal clerk serves at the pleasure of the governing body. The clerk shall perform, as applicable, the duties prescribed by law for the county clerk of a county court at law and any other duty necessary to issue process and conduct business of the court. The clerk may administer oaths and affidavits and make certificates and affix the court's seal to those certificates. In addition, the clerk shall:

(1) maintain central docket records for all cases filed in the municipal courts of record; and

(2) maintain an index of all court judgments in the same manner as county clerks are required by law to prepare for criminal cases arising in county courts.

(b) With the consent of the governing body of the city, the clerk may appoint one or more deputy clerks to act for and on behalf of the clerk.

(c) The governing body of the city shall provide the courts with other municipal court personnel that the governing body determines necessary for the proper operation of the courts. Those persons shall perform their duties under the direction and control of the clerk of the municipal court or the municipal judge to whom assigned. The governing body shall determine the salaries of the court personnel.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 31, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.326 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.22, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER U. ODESSA

Sec. 30.00771. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Odessa.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county courts at law of Ector County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.351 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.23, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 73, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00774. JUDGE. (a) to (e) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(20), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(f) Section 30.00007(b)(5) does not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 235, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.354 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.23, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 74, 139(20), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00778. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager shall provide for the appointment of a clerk of the municipal courts of record, who shall be known as the municipal clerk. The municipal clerk shall perform, as applicable, the duties prescribed by law for the county clerk of a county court at law. In addition, the clerk shall:

(1) maintain central docket records for all cases filed in the municipal courts of record; and

(2) maintain an index of all municipal court of record judgments in the same manner as county clerks are required by law to prepare for criminal cases arising in county courts.

(b) The governing body of the city shall provide the courts with other municipal court personnel that the governing body determines necessary for the proper operation of the courts. Those persons shall perform their duties under the direction and control of the clerk or the municipal judge to whom assigned. The governing body shall determine the salaries of the court personnel.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 32, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 235, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.358 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.23, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00779. RECORDING OF PROCEEDINGS; COURT REPORTER. (a) to (e) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(20), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(f) Section 30.00010(d) does not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 235, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.359 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.23, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 75, 139(20), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.007801. PROSECUTION BY CITY ATTORNEY. All prosecutions in a municipal court of record must be conducted by the city attorney or an assistant or deputy city attorney.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 235, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Transferred from Government Code, Section 30.3601 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(19), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 30.007802. COMPLAINT; PLEADING. (a) A complaint filed in a municipal court of record must begin "In the name and by authority of the State of Texas" and must conclude "Against the peace and dignity of the State."

(b) Complaints must comply with Article 45.17, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(c) Pleadings must be in writing and must be filed with the municipal court clerk.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 235, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Transferred from Government Code, Section 30.3602 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(19), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 30.007803. JURY. (a) A person brought before a municipal court of record and charged with an offense is entitled to be tried by a jury of six persons, unless that right is waived according to law.

(b) A juror for the court must have the qualifications required of jurors by law and must be a resident of the city.

(c) A juror is entitled to receive the compensation for each day and each fraction of a day in attendance on a municipal court of record jury as provided by Chapter 61.

(d) The clerk of the court shall establish a fair, impartial, and objective juror selection process.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 235, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Transferred from Government Code, Section 30.3603 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(19), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 30.007804. COURT RULES. (a) Except as modified by this subchapter, the Code of Criminal Procedure as applied to county courts at law governs the trial of cases before municipal courts of record.

(b) Bonds must be payable to the state for the use and benefit of the city. The court may not assess court costs other than warrant fees, capias fees, and other fees authorized for municipal courts of record.

(c) A peace officer may serve a process issued by a municipal court of record.

(d) A conviction, judgment, and sentence are in the name of the state, and the state recovers from the defendant the fine and fees for the use and benefit of the city.

(e) Fines, fees, costs, and bonds shall be paid to the clerk of the court, who shall deposit them in the city general fund.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 235, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Transferred from Government Code, Section 30.3604 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(19), eff. September 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER V. DALLAS

Sec. 30.00811. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Dallas.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Dallas County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.381 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.24, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 76, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00814. JUDGE. (a) to (c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(21), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(d) In addition to performing duties under Sections 30.00007(b)(1) and (4), the administrative municipal judge shall promulgate work rules for the administration of the municipal courts.

(e), (f) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(21), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(g) Sections 30.00007(b)(2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 157, Sec. 2, 3, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.384 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.24, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 77, 139(21), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00818. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The governing body shall provide for the appointment of a clerk of the municipal courts of record, who shall be known as the municipal clerk. The municipal clerk shall perform for the municipal courts of record, as applicable, the duties prescribed by law for the county clerk of a county court at law. In addition, the clerk shall maintain central docket records for all cases filed in the municipal courts of record.

(b) The governing body of the city shall provide the courts with other municipal court personnel that the governing body determines necessary for the proper operation of the courts. Those persons shall perform their duties under the direction and control of the clerk of the municipal court or the municipal judge to whom assigned. The governing body shall determine the salaries of the court personnel.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 157, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 31, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 33, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.388 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.24, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER W. ARLINGTON

Sec. 30.00851. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Arlington.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Tarrant County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 575, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.421 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.25, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 78, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00854. JUDGE. (a) to (c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(22), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(d) In addition to satisfying the requirements of Section 30.00006(c), a municipal judge shall devote as much time to the office as it requires.

(e) to (j) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(22), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(k) Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 575, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.424 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.25, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 79, 139(22), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00855. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager of the city shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record who may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the city charter, and city ordinances.

(b) Sections 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 575, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.425 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.25, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 80, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00856. COURT REPORTER. (a) The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

(b) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(22), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 575, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.426 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.25, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 81, 139(22), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER X. GARLAND

Sec. 30.00891. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Garland.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Dallas County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 161, Sec. 1, eff. May 25, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.451 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.26, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 82, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00894. JUDGE. (a) to (f) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(23), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(g) Sections 30.00007(b)(5) and 30.00008(b) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 161, Sec. 1, eff. May 25, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1342, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.454 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.26, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 83, 139(23), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00895. CLERK. (a) The city manager shall appoint a clerk of the municipal courts of record. The clerk or the clerk's deputies shall keep the records of the municipal courts of record, issue process, and generally perform the duties for the courts that a clerk of a county court exercising criminal jurisdiction is required by law to perform for that court. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the city charter, and city ordinances.

(b) Sections 30.00009(a), (c), and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 161, Sec. 1, eff. May 25, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.455 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.26, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 84, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00896. COURT REPORTER. (a) The official court reporter shall be appointed by the chief judge under Section 30.00010.

(b) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(23), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 161, Sec. 1, eff. May 25, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1342, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.456 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.26, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 85, 139(23), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER Y. AMARILLO

Sec. 30.00931. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Amarillo.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county courts at law in Potter and Randall counties.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 694, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.521 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.27, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 86, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00934. JUDGE. (a) A municipal judge need not be a resident of the city at the time of appointment but must, in addition to satisfying the requirements of Section 30.00006(c), maintain residence in the city during the term of office. The judge shall devote full time to the duties of that office and may not engage in the private practice of law while in office. The restrictions on the residency of and private practice by a municipal judge do not apply to a judge employed to work less than 40 hours per week.

(b) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(24), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(e) The governing body of the city shall appoint a judge to be the presiding municipal judge who shall, in addition to performing duties under Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (3), and (4), assign cases among the judges.

(f) Sections 30.00007(b)(2) and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 694, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.524 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.27, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 87, 139(24), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 182 (H.B. 596), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2005.

Sec. 30.00937. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. The city manager of the city shall provide for the appointment of a municipal court clerk to serve as clerk of the municipal courts of record. The municipal court clerk shall perform the duties prescribed by ordinance and by applicable law and may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the annual budget for the clerk's office.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 694, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.527 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.27, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.00939. COURT REPORTER. (a) For the purpose of preserving a record in cases tried before the municipal court, the city manager shall provide an official court reporter who has the qualifications provided by law for official court reporters.

(b), (c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(24), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(d) Section 30.00010(d) does not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 694, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.529 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.27, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 88, 139(24), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER Z. ADDISON

Sec. 30.00971. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the town of Addison.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Dallas County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1003, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.651 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.28, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 89, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00976. JUDGE. (a) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(25), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(e) Section 30.00007(b)(5) does not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1003, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.656 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.28, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 90, 139(25), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00977. CLERK. The city manager, with the consent of the governing body of the city, shall appoint a clerk of the municipal courts of record who may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the city charter, and city ordinances.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1003, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1987. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.657 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.28, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 91, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.00978. COURT REPORTER. (a) The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

(b) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(25), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(c) The court reporter is not required to record testimony in a case unless the judge or one of the parties requests a record. A party's request for a record must be in writing and filed with the court before trial.

(d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(25), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1003, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1987. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 877, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.658 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.28, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 92, 139(25), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER AA. GRAPEVINE

Sec. 30.01011. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the city of Grapevine.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Tarrant County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 50, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.691 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.29, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 93, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01014. JUDGE. (a) to (c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(d) In addition to satisfying the requirements of Section 30.00006(c), a municipal judge must maintain residence in the city during the tenure of office and must be a resident of the city at the time of appointment or election. The judge shall devote as much time to the office as it requires.

(e) to (i) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(j) An alternate judge must have the same qualifications as a municipal judge, except that an alternate judge may, but need not be, a resident of the city.

(k) Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 50, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.694 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.29, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 94, 139(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01015. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager of the city shall appoint a clerk of the municipal courts of record who may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the city charter, and city ordinances.

(b) Sections 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 50, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.695 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.29, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 95, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01016. COURT REPORTER. (a) The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

(b) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 50, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.696 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.29, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 96, 139(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER BB. HURST

Sec. 30.01051. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Hurst.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Tarrant County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 340, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.721 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.30, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 97, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01054. JUDGE. (a) to (c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(27), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(d) In addition to exercising powers under Section 30.00006(e), a municipal judge shall devote as much time to the office as it requires.

(e) to (j) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(27), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(k) Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 340, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.724 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.30, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 98, 139(27), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01055. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager of the city shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record who may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the city charter, and city ordinances.

(b) Sections 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 340, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.725 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.30, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 99, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01056. COURT REPORTER. (a) The presiding judge shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

(b) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(27), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 340, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.726 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.30, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 100, 139(27), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER CC. CARROLLTON

Sec. 30.01091. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Carrollton.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Dallas County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 324, Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.851 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.31, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 101, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01096. JUDGE. (a) In addition to satisfying the requirements of Section 30.00006(c), a presiding municipal judge must maintain residence in the city during the tenure of office. The municipal judge shall devote full time to the duties of the office as necessary.

(b), (c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(28), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(d) Section 30.00007(b)(5) does not apply to this subchapter.

(e) A municipal court of record may be presided over by an assistant municipal judge.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 324, Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.856 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.31, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 102, 139(28), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.010975. AUTOMATIC RESIGNATION. If the municipal judge or an assistant municipal judge announces a candidacy or becomes a candidate in a general, special, or primary election, for any office of profit or trust under the laws of the state or the United States, the announcement or the candidacy constitutes an automatic resignation of the appointment, effective the date of the announcement or candidacy.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 103, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01098. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record who shall be known as the municipal court clerk. The clerk may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office.

(b), (c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(28), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(d) Sections 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 324, Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.858 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.31, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 104, 139(28), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01099. COURT REPORTER. (a) The city shall provide a court reporter for the purpose of preserving a record in cases tried before the municipal court of record. The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter, who must meet the qualifications provided by law for official court reporters.

(b) to (e) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(28), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 324, Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.859 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.31, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(28), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER DD. WHITE SETTLEMENT

Sec. 30.01131. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of White Settlement.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Tarrant County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 630, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.881 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.32, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 105, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01134. JUDGE. (a) to (c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(29), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(d) In addition to exercising powers under Section 30.00006(e), a municipal judge shall devote as much time to the office as it requires.

(e) to (j) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(29), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(k) Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 630, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.884 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.32, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 106, 139(29), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01135. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager of the city shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record who may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the city charter, and city ordinances.

(b) Sections 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 630, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.885 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.32, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 107, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01136. COURT REPORTER. (a) The presiding judge shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

(b) to (e) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(29), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 630, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.886 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.32, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 108, 139(29), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01137. MAGISTRATES. (a) The governing body may appoint one or more magistrates to act on behalf of a municipal court of record or a municipal court in the city of White Settlement.

(b) A magistrate is not required to possess all the qualifications necessary to be a municipal court of record judge.

(c) A magistrate may not preside over the court or hear contested cases.

(d) A magistrate may:

(1) conduct an arraignment;

(2) hold an indigency hearing;

(3) accept a plea;

(4) sign a judgment;

(5) set the amount of a bond; and

(6) perform other functions under Article 15.17, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1076 (H.B. 4750), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 30.01148. DISPOSITION ON APPEAL. (a) to (c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(29), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(d) Section 30.00009(c) does not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 630, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.898 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.32, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 109, 139(29), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER EE. EULESS

Sec. 30.01171. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Euless.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Tarrant County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 325, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.916 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.33, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 110, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01174. JUDGE. (a) to (c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(30), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(d) In addition to exercising powers under Section 30.00006(e), a municipal judge shall devote as much time to the office as it requires.

(e) to (j) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(30), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(k) Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 325, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.919 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.33, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 111, 139(30), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01175. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager of the city shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record who may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the city charter, and city ordinances.

(b) Sections 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 325, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.920 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.33, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 112, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01176. COURT REPORTER. (a) The presiding judge shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

(b) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(30), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 325, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.921 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.33, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 113, 139(30), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER FF. DENTON

Sec. 30.01211. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the city of Denton.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county courts at law of Denton County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 884, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.981 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.34, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 114, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01216. JUDGE. (a) The municipal judge shall devote as much time as necessary to perform the duties of the office.

(b), (c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(31), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 884, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.986 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.34, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 115, 139(31), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01218. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record who shall be known as the "municipal court clerk."

(b) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(31), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(c) The clerk may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 884, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.988 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.34, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(31), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01219. COURT REPORTER. (a) The presiding judge shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

(b) to (e) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(31), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 884, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 30.989 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 8.34, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 116, 139(31), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER GG. LAKE WORTH

Sec. 30.01251. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Lake Worth.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Tarrant County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 182, Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 117, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01254. JUDGE. (a) to (c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(32), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(d) In addition to exercising powers under Section 30.00006(e), a municipal judge shall devote as much time to the office as it requires.

(e) to (j) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(32), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(k) Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 182, Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 118, 139(32), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01255. MAGISTRATES.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(a) The governing body may appoint one or more magistrates in addition to magistrates provided under Article 2.09, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(a) The governing body may appoint one or more magistrates in addition to magistrates provided under Article 2A.151, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(b) A magistrate does not have to possess all the qualifications necessary to be a municipal court of record judge.

(c) A magistrate may not preside over the court or hear contested cases.

(d) A magistrate may:

(1) conduct an arraignment;

(2) hold an indigency hearing;

(3) accept a plea;

(4) sign a judgment;

(5) set the amount of a bond; and

(6) perform other functions under Article 15.17, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 182, Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.061, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 30.01256. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city administrator of the city shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record who may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the city charter, and city ordinances.

(b) Sections 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 182, Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 119, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01257. COURT REPORTER. (a) The presiding judge shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

(b) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(32), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 182, Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 120, 139(32), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01273. JOINT COURTS: CREATION. (a) The governing body of the city may contract with one or more municipalities that have municipal courts of record to establish a joint municipal court of record to serve the contracting municipalities.

(b) A joint municipal court of record created under this section replaces each municipality's individual municipal court of record.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 182, Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 1997.

Sec. 30.01274. JOINT COURT: JUDGES. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a joint municipal court of record created under Section 30.01273 is presided over by a municipal judge or alternate municipal judge who is appointed by a majority vote of each of the governing bodies of the contracting municipalities for a two-year term.

(b) The judge of a joint municipal court of record may be removed from office by the governing bodies of the contracting municipalities at any time for incompetency, misconduct, malfeasance, or inability to perform the tasks of the office.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 182, Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 1997.

Sec. 30.01275. JOINT COURTS: JURISDICTION. (a) The jurisdiction of a joint municipal court of record created under Section 30.01273 is the combined jurisdiction of the municipal courts of the contracting municipalities.

(b) An appeal from a joint municipal court of record created under Section 30.01273 is to the county criminal court of the county in which the offense occurred. If that county does not have a county criminal court, appeal is to the county court of law of the county.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 182, Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 1997.

Sec. 30.01276. JOINT COURT: PROSECUTING ATTORNEY. A municipality that contracts under Section 30.01273 may provide its own prosecuting attorney or the contracting municipalities may agree on the selection of one or more prosecuting attorneys.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 182, Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 1997.

Sec. 30.01277. JOINT COURT: APPLICABLE LAW. (a) The municipalities by contract shall select one of the contracting municipality's enabling statutes as the source of applicable procedural requirements for the operation of the joint municipal court of record established under Section 30.01273.

(b) All of the provisions of the statute selected under Subsection (a) apply to the operation of the joint municipal court of record. If there is a conflict with any of the provisions in Sections 30.01273-30.01276, those sections control.

(c) Any matter that is not governed by the contracting municipalities' enabling legislation or other law shall be resolved by the contract entered into under Section 30.01273.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 182, Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER II. LEWISVILLE

Sec. 30.01321. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Lewisville.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county courts at law of Denton County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 87, Sec. 1, eff. May 15, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 125, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01326. JUDGE. (a) to (c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(34), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(d) In addition to exercising powers under Section 30.00006(e), a municipal judge shall devote as much time to the office as it requires.

(e), (f) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(34), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(g) Section 30.00007(b)(5) does not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 87, Sec. 1, eff. May 15, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 126, 139(34), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01328. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager of the city shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record who shall be known as the "Lewisville Municipal Court Clerk."

(b) The clerk may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office.

(c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(34), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 87, Sec. 1, eff. May 15, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(34), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01329. COURT REPORTER. (a) The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

(b) to (e) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(34), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 87, Sec. 1, eff. May 15, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 127, 139(34), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER JJ. DALWORTHINGTON GARDENS

Sec. 30.01371. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Dalworthington Gardens.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Tarrant County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 935, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 128, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01374. JUDGE. (a) to (c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(35), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(d) In addition to exercising powers under Section 30.00006(e), a municipal judge shall devote as much time to the office as it requires.

(e) to (j) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(35), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(k) Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 935, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 129, 139(35), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01375. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. The city secretary shall be, ex officio, the clerk of the municipal court of record and may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office. The clerk or the clerk's deputies shall keep the records of the municipal courts of record, issue process, and generally perform the duties for the courts that a clerk of the county court exercising criminal jurisdiction is required by law to perform for that court. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the city charter, and city ordinances.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 935, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 30.01376. COURT REPORTER. (a) The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

(b) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(35), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 935, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 130, 139(35), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER KK. RICHARDSON

Sec. 30.01401. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Richardson.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Dallas County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1044, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 131, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01406. JUDGE. (a) , (b) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(36), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(c) A municipal judge is entitled to receive compensation or a salary and other benefits set by the governing body of the city. The judge's compensation or salary may not be diminished during the term of office. The compensation or salary may not be based directly or indirectly on fines, fees, or other costs that the municipal judge is required by law to collect during a term of office.

(d) Section 30.00007 does not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1044, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 132, 139(36), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01408. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record who shall be known as the municipal court clerk.

(b) The clerk or the clerk's deputies shall keep the records of the municipal courts of record, issue process, and generally perform the duties for the court that a clerk of the county court exercising criminal jurisdiction is required by law to perform for that court. The clerk shall perform the duties in accordance with statutes, the city charter, and city ordinances.

(c) The clerk, the city manager, or the person designated as court administrator by the city manager may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office.

(d) Section 30.00009(c) does not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1044, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 133, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER LL. COPPELL

Sec. 30.01441. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the City of Coppell.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county criminal courts of Dallas County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 366, Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 134, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01446. JUDGE. (a) to (d) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(37), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(e) A municipal judge is entitled to compensation or a salary and other benefits set by the governing body of the city. The governing body may not base the compensation or salary directly or indirectly on fines, fees, or costs collected by the court.

(f) Section 30.00007 does not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 366, Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 135, 139(37), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01448. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record.

(b) The clerk may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office, including deputies and bailiffs as may be necessary or appropriate.

(c) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(37), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 366, Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 139(37), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER MM. BULLARD

Sec. 30.01481. APPLICATION. This subchapter applies to the City of Bullard.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 499, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001.

Sec. 30.01482. QUALIFICATIONS OF JUDGE. (a) A municipal judge must be:

(1) a resident of this state; and

(2) a citizen of the United States.

(b) Section 30.00006(c) does not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 499, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER NN. TYLER

Sec. 30.01511. APPLICATION. This subchapter applies to the City of Tyler.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01512. JUDGE. (a) A municipal court of record is presided over by a municipal judge appointed to office by the city manager in the manner provided by the city charter.

(b) If the city manager appoints more than one municipal judge under Subsection (a), the city manager shall appoint one of the municipal judges as the presiding municipal judge.

(c) A municipal judge is entitled to a salary from the city the amount of which is determined by the city manager. A municipal judge's salary may not be diminished during the judge's term of office. A municipal judge's salary may not be based directly or indirectly on fines, fees, or costs collected by the court.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01513. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. The city manager shall provide a clerk of the municipal courts of record. The city manager shall provide deputy clerks, warrant officers, and other personnel as needed for the proper operation of the municipal courts of record. The clerk and other court personnel shall perform their duties under the direction and control of the city manager.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01514. COURT REPORTER. The municipal court clerk shall appoint the court reporter.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01515. APPEAL. The County Court of Smith County has jurisdiction over an appeal.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER OO. SANSOM PARK

Sec. 30.01541. APPLICATION. This subchapter applies to the City of Sansom Park.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01542. MAGISTRATES.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(a) The governing body may appoint one or more magistrates in addition to magistrates provided under Article 2.09, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(a) The governing body may appoint one or more magistrates in addition to magistrates provided under Article 2A.151, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(b) A magistrate does not have to possess all the qualifications necessary to be a municipal court of record judge.

(c) A magistrate may not preside over the court or hear contested cases.

(d) A magistrate may:

(1) conduct an arraignment;

(2) hold an indigency hearing;

(3) accept a plea;

(4) sign a judgment;

(5) set the amount of a bond; and

(6) perform other functions under Article 15.17, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.062, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 30.01543. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. The city administrator of the city shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record who may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01544. COURT REPORTER. The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01545. APPEAL. The county criminal courts of Tarrant County have jurisdiction over an appeal.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01546. JOINT COURTS: CREATION. (a) The governing body of the city may contract with one or more municipalities that have municipal courts of record to establish a joint municipal court of record to serve the contracting municipalities.

(b) A joint municipal court of record created under this section replaces each municipality's individual municipal court of record.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01547. JOINT COURT: JUDGES. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a joint municipal court of record created under Section 30.01546 is presided over by a municipal judge or alternate municipal judge who is appointed by a majority vote of each of the governing bodies of the contracting municipalities for a two-year term.

(b) The judge of a joint municipal court of record may be removed from office as provided by Section 30.000085 by the governing bodies of the contracting municipalities at any time for incompetency, misconduct, malfeasance, or inability to perform the tasks of the office.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01548. JOINT COURTS: JURISDICTION. (a) The jurisdiction of a joint municipal court of record created under Section 30.01546 is the combined jurisdiction of the municipal courts of the contracting municipalities.

(b) An appeal from a joint municipal court of record created under Section 30.01546 is to the county criminal court of the county in which the offense occurred. If that county does not have a county criminal court, appeal is to the county court of law of the county.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01549. JOINT COURT: PROSECUTING ATTORNEY. A municipality that contracts under Section 30.01546 may provide its own prosecuting attorney or the contracting municipalities may agree on the selection of one or more prosecuting attorneys.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01550. JOINT COURT: APPLICABLE LAW. (a) The municipalities by contract shall select one of the contracting municipality's enabling statutes as the source of applicable procedural requirements for the operation of the joint municipal court of record established under Section 30.01546.

(b) All of the provisions of the statute selected under Subsection (a) apply to the operation of the joint municipal court of record. If there is a conflict with any of the provisions in Sections 30.01546-30.01549, those sections control.

(c) Any matter that is not governed by the contracting municipalities' enabling legislation or other law shall be resolved by the contract entered into under Section 30.01546.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER PP. FARMERS BRANCH

Sec. 30.01591. APPLICATION. This subchapter applies to the City of Farmers Branch.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01592. CREATION. On creation of the initial municipal court of record, the governing body of the city shall determine the method of selecting the judge of a municipal court of record by:

(1) adopting an ordinance that provides for the appointment of a municipal judge by the governing body of the city;

(2) adopting an ordinance that provides for the election of a municipal judge by the qualified voters of the city; or

(3) ordering an election in which the qualified voters of the city determine whether a municipal judge is appointed by the governing body of the city or elected.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01593. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record, who shall be known as the municipal court clerk.

(b) The clerk may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01594. COURT REPORTER. The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01595. APPEAL. The county criminal courts of appeal of Dallas County have jurisdiction of appeals from the municipal courts of record.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER QQ. HILL COUNTRY VILLAGE

Sec. 30.01631. APPLICATION. This subchapter applies to the City of Hill Country Village.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01632. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. The city secretary shall be, ex officio, the clerk of the municipal court of record and may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01633. COURT REPORTER. The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01634. APPEAL. The county courts at law of Bexar County have jurisdiction over an appeal.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER RR. RIO BRAVO

Sec. 30.01691. APPLICATION. This subchapter applies to the City of Rio Bravo.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01692. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. The city manager or city administrator of the city shall appoint a clerk of the municipal court of record who may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01693. COURT REPORTER. The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01694. APPEAL. The county courts at law of Webb County have jurisdiction over an appeal.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER SS. LIVE OAK

Sec. 30.01721. APPLICATION. This subchapter applies to the City of Live Oak.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 137, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01722. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. The city secretary shall be, ex officio, the clerk of the municipal court of record and may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 137, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01723. COURT REPORTER. The clerk of the court shall appoint the court reporter.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 137, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01724. APPEAL. The county courts at law of Bexar County have jurisdiction over an appeal.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 137, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER TT. FLOWER MOUND

Sec. 30.01751. APPLICATION. This subchapter applies to the Town of Flower Mound.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 138, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.017515. JUDGE. (a) A municipal court of record is presided over by a municipal judge.

(b) A municipal judge is appointed by the mayor with the concurrence of the governing body of the municipality and serves at the pleasure of the governing body.

(c) A municipal judge shall:

(1) devote as much time to the office as necessary; and

(2) take judicial notice of state law, municipal ordinances, and the corporate limits of the municipality.

(d) If there is more than one municipal judge appointed under Subsection (b), the mayor shall appoint one of the judges as the presiding municipal judge.

(e) A municipal judge is entitled to a salary from the municipality, the amount of which is determined by the governing body of the municipality. The amount of a municipal judge's salary may not be based directly or indirectly on fines, fees, or costs collected by the court.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 138, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01752. COURT REPORTER. The municipal court clerk shall appoint the court reporter. The town manager shall set the compensation of the court reporter.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 138, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 30.01753. APPEAL. The appropriate county court of Denton County having jurisdiction over appeals from municipal courts shall have jurisdiction over any appeal.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 691, Sec. 138, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER UU. WESTLAKE

Sec. 30.01781. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the Town of Westlake located in Tarrant and Denton counties.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county courts at law of Tarrant County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 602, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER VV. TROPHY CLUB

Sec. 30.01811. APPLICATION; DEFINITION. (a) This subchapter applies to the Town of Trophy Club located in Tarrant and Denton counties.

(b) In this subchapter, "appellate courts" means the county courts at law of Denton County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 903, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER WW. LAREDO

Sec. 30.01821. APPLICATION. This subchapter applies to the city of Laredo.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 897 (H.B. 2617), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 30.01822. JUDGE. (a) A municipal court of record is presided over by a municipal judge.

(b) A municipal judge is elected at large by the qualified voters of the city of Laredo for a term of four years. Except as provided by Subsection (d), a municipal judge may not serve more than two terms.

(c) A municipal judge must:

(1) be a licensed attorney in this state; and

(2) be a resident of the city of Laredo.

(d) A municipal judge may serve the remainder of an unexpired term to which the judge was elected or appointed and serve two additional terms.

(e) A municipal judge is entitled to the salary provided by ordinance of the governing body of the city.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 897 (H.B. 2617), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 30.01823. CLERK; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The governing body of the city by majority vote shall appoint a clerk of a municipal court of record. The clerk must be nominated by the city manager.

(b) The clerk serves at the pleasure of the governing body of the city, and the employment status of the clerk is equivalent to a department director.

(c) In addition to the powers and duties provided by Section 30.00009, the clerk may:

(1) administer oaths and affidavits;

(2) make certificates and affix the seal of the municipal court of record to the certificates; and

(3) perform any act necessary to issue process and conduct the business of the court.

(d) The governing body may provide other personnel, including associate municipal judges.

(e) The governing body may authorize the appointment of deputy clerks, who may act for and on behalf of the clerk, as necessary for the proper operation of a municipal court of record.

(f) The clerk shall hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized for the clerk's office in the city's annual budget.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 897 (H.B. 2617), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER XX. BEDFORD

Sec. 30.01881. APPLICATION. This subchapter applies to the City of Bedford.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 773, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 30.01882. JUDGE. The governing body of the city may determine by ordinance whether a municipal judge is appointed by the governing body or elected by the qualified voters of the city by a majority vote. A municipal judge serves for a term of three years.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 773, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER YY. MESQUITE

Sec. 30.01891. APPLICATION; DEFINITIONS. (a) This subchapter applies to the city of Mesquite.

(b) In this subchapter:

(1) "Appellate courts" means the county courts at law of Dallas County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

(2) "Municipal court administrator" means the clerk of the municipal courts of record.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 155 (H.B. 1889), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 30.01892. JUDGE. Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 155 (H.B. 1889), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 30.01893. COURT RULES. The presiding judge shall adopt rules not inconsistent with this subchapter or other law for the municipal courts of record to provide efficiency, uniformity, and fairness in the conduct of the business of the courts. The rules may:

(1) address courtroom decorum and attire;

(2) address court protocol;

(3) govern the hearing of pleas, motions for continuance, motions to withdraw and for substitution, and pretrial motions;

(4) establish procedures related to a defendant's failure to appear;

(5) establish procedures related to a defendant's indigency or inability to pay fines; and

(6) address warrant procedures.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 155 (H.B. 1889), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 30.01894. MUNICIPAL COURT ADMINISTRATOR; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager shall appoint a municipal court administrator to serve as the clerk of the municipal courts of record.

(b) The municipal court administrator shall:

(1) perform, as applicable, the duties prescribed by law for the county clerk of a county court at law;

(2) maintain central docket records for all cases filed in the municipal courts of record;

(3) maintain an index of all municipal courts of record judgments in the same manner as county clerks are required by law to prepare for criminal cases arising in county courts; and

(4) request the jurors needed for cases that are set for trial by jury.

(c) The municipal court administrator may hire, direct, supervise, and remove personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office in accordance with the city's general government policies and procedures manual and subject to approval by the city manager.

(d) Sections 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 155 (H.B. 1889), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 30.01895. COURT REPORTER. The municipal court administrator shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 155 (H.B. 1889), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER ZZ. CORPUS CHRISTI

Sec. 30.01901. APPLICATION; DEFINITIONS. (a) This subchapter applies to the city of Corpus Christi.

(b) In this subchapter:

(1) "Appellate courts" means the county courts at law of Nueces County that have criminal appellate jurisdiction.

(2) "Municipal court director" means the clerk of the municipal courts of record.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 441 (S.B. 2009), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 30.01902. JUDGE. Sections 30.00007(b)(1), (2), (3), and (5) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 441 (S.B. 2009), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 30.01903. MUNICIPAL COURT DIRECTOR; OTHER PERSONNEL. (a) The city manager shall appoint a municipal court director to serve as the clerk of the municipal courts of record.

(b) The municipal court director shall perform, as applicable, the duties prescribed by law for the county clerk of a county court at law. In addition, the municipal court director shall:

(1) maintain central docket records for all cases filed in the municipal courts of record;

(2) maintain an index of all municipal court of record judgments in the same manner as county clerks are required by law to prepare for criminal cases arising in county courts; and

(3) request the jurors needed for cases that are set for trial by jury.

(c) The municipal court director may hire, direct, and remove the personnel authorized in the city's annual budget for the clerk's office.

(d) Sections 30.00009(c) and (d) do not apply to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 441 (S.B. 2009), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 30.01904. COURT REPORTER. The municipal court director shall appoint the court reporter under Section 30.00010.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 441 (S.B. 2009), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.